Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202279-992.02
False or fraudulent claim or benefit application; prohibited acts; penalty.

(1) Any person who, knowing it to be false or fraudulent, presents or causes to be presented a false or fraudulent claim or benefit application, any false or fraudulent proof in support of such a claim or benefit, or false or fraudulent information which would affect a future claim or benefit application to be paid under a retirement system for the purpose of defrauding or attempting to defraud the retirement system shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. The (a) administrator and the board until September 1, 2024, and (b) retirement board beginning September 1, 2024, shall deny any benefits that it determines are based on false or fraudulent information and shall have a cause of action against the member to recover any benefits already paid on the basis of such information.

(2) Any employee, member of a board of education, or agent of any employer who willfully fails or refuses to furnish to the (a) administrator and the board of trustees until September 1, 2024, and (b) retirement board beginning September 1, 2024, upon its request and in the manner prescribed by it such information, data, or records, as may be necessary for carrying into effect the Class V School Employees Retirement Act, shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 2017, LB415, § 39;

Laws 2021, LB147, § 28.